Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Employee and Employer Contributions to the Retirement System

47-4-60.
Amount of contributions; manner of payment.

Each member shall contribute $4.00 monthly as the employee contribution toward the cost of the retirement system; provided, however, that any person first or again becoming a member of this retirement system on or after July 1, 2012, shall contribute $10.00 monthly as the employee contribution. Each local unit of administration shall deduct such amount each month from the compensation of each of its employees who is a member of the retirement system and pay the amounts so deducted to the board. The board shall specify by rules and regulations the time and manner such amounts shall be paid to it.

The employer contributions toward the cost of the retirement system shall be as actuarially determined and approved by the board; and, in making such determination, each local unit of administration shall supply the board with such information at such times and in such manner as the board shall specify by rules and regulations. The amounts determined as the employer contributions shall be certified to the state treasurer at such times as the board shall specify by rules and regulations. It shall be the duty of the state treasurer to pay to the board, from funds appropriated or otherwise available to the retirement system, the amounts so certified by the board. All employer contributions shall be irrevocable and may be used only for the exclusive benefit of members or their beneficiaries.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 10; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1284, § 1/SB 246.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “state treasurer” for “director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in the second and third sentences of subsection (b).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added “; provided, however, that any person first or again becoming a member of this retirement system on or after July 1, 2012, shall contribute $10.00 monthly as the employee contribution” to the end of the first sentence in subsection (a).

47-4-61.
Date for start of employee contributions.

No public school employee shall be obligated to make employee contributions to the retirement system until July 1, 1970, under subsection (a) of Code Section 47-4-29.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 23.